New York, session 2025-2026, S2282.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds that 2 localities throughout New York State have struggled to prevent the pre- 3 trial release of individuals who pose a threat to themselves and their 4 communities. Moreover, many municipalities outside of New York City lack 5 adequate funding and resources to develop and appropriate plans and 6 invest in necessary technology, such as GPS monitoring, for successful 7 monitoring of criminal defendants who have been released into the commu- 8 nity pending trial. We also find that the current system for determining 9 remand, coupled with this lack of resources, has enabled individuals to 10 reoffend during their period of pre-trial release. As a result, we have 11 seen an increase in crime and a growing concern about public safety 12 throughout our state. In response, the legislature seeks to create a 13 system that balances reasonable fairness for criminal defendants and the 14 need to protect the public from dangerous offenders. This proposal would 15 create a risk assessment instrument to determine the danger an individ- 16 ual poses to themselves and the community. By using this instrument, 17 courts can make decisions regarding remand which are unrelated to an 18 individual's ability to afford bail, accomplishing the stated goals of 19 previous reforms while also ensuring public safety. This proposal EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04400-03-5 S. 2282--A 2 1 further addresses the threat posed by repeat offenders by ensuring that 2 individuals arrested for a new serious offense after being released 3 remain in custody pending trial. We also find that it is crucial that 4 individuals with serious mental illnesses are quickly evaluated and 5 provided treatment rather than being incarcerated without access to 6 necessary support. Accordingly, this proposal encourages courts to 7 utilize existing statute to refer individuals in need of mental health 8 treatment to the appropriate venue. 9 § 2. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the 10 "pretrial risk overview for threat evaluation, custody, and treatment 11 (PROTECT) act". 12 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 845-f to 13 read as follows: 14 § 845-f. Risk assessment instrument. 1. The division shall create a 15 risk assessment instrument to be used by all courts in the state to aid 16 judges in determining whether to release or detain a principal, where 17 and when release is appropriate, and, where applicable, necessary condi- 18 tions that should be imposed as part of such release. Such instrument 19 shall be developed based on empirical data and risk factors relevant to 20 the danger that the principal poses to themself, another person, or the 21 community as a whole, and the likelihood that such principal may attempt 22 to evade or obstruct the criminal justice process. Such tool shall 23 incorporate the following factors, including but not limited to: 24 (a) The nature of the charge and whether it involves allegations of 25 causing or threatening harm to another person or persons; 26 (b) The principal's criminal history, with emphasis on previous 27 convictions for violent felonies, escape, bail jumping, witness tamper- 28 ing and witness intimidation, and any history of failing to appear in 29 court or failing to comply with court orders. Such criminal history 30 shall include, but not be limited to, criminal convictions, juvenile 31 delinquent and youthful offender adjudications; 32 (c) The principal's history of use or possession of firearms or access 33 to deadly weapons or dangerous instruments, as defined in section 10.00 34 of the penal law; 35 (d) The principal's known associations with criminal street gangs as 36 defined in section 10-170 of the administrative code of the city of New 37 York or a criminal enterprise, as defined in section 460.10 of the penal 38 law; 39 (e) Any history of threats or intimidation to witnesses in prior crim- 40 inal proceedings; and 41 (f) The extent of the principal's history within the jurisdiction 42 where the criminal charges are pending, and the extent of ties, includ- 43 ing family ties, outside the state of New York. 44 2. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the division from incorpo- 45 rating any other factors which may aid in determining whether a princi- 46 pal poses a risk of flight or a safety risk. 47 3. Such instrument shall include a recommendation as to whether a 48 principal should be detained, released on bail, or released on non-mone- 49 tary conditions as well as a recommendation as to which non-monetary 50 conditions should be imposed. 51 § 4. The criminal procedure law is amended by adding a new section 52 510.16 to read as follows: 53 § 510.16 Completion of risk assessment instrument. 54 1. The court shall order the completion of a risk assessment instru- 55 ment created by the division of criminal justice services pursuant to 56 section eight hundred forty-seven-f of the executive law for all princi- S. 2282--A 3 1 pals who are charged with a felony or class A misdemeanor. Once a prin- 2 cipal is arraigned on a felony or class A misdemeanor, the court shall 3 direct the applicable pretrial services agency to complete a risk 4 assessment instrument. The court shall order the detention of a princi- 5 pal pending the completion of such risk assessment instrument. Absent 6 extraordinary circumstances, the court shall make a decision on 7 detention within forty-eight hours. 8 2. No court may release a principal charged with a felony or a class A 9 misdemeanor unless and until it has had an opportunity to review and 10 consider a completed risk assessment instrument. 11 § 5. Subdivision 1 of section 510.10 of the criminal procedure law, as 12 amended by section 1 of subpart C of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws 13 of 2022, the opening paragraph as amended by section 2 of subpart A of 14 part VV of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 1. When a principal, whose future court attendance at a criminal 17 action or proceeding is or may be required, comes under the control of a 18 court, such court shall impose a securing order in accordance with this 19 title. Except as otherwise required by law, the court shall make an 20 individualized determination as to whether the principal poses a risk of 21 flight to avoid prosecution and/or a risk to the safety and security of 22 the community, themself, or another person, consider the kind and degree 23 of control or restriction necessary to reasonably assure the principal's 24 return to court, and select a securing order consistent with its deter- 25 mination under this subdivision. The court shall explain the basis for 26 its determination and its choice of securing order on the record or in 27 writing. In making a determination under this subdivision, the court 28 must consider and take into account the risk assessment instrument, the 29 recommendation of the pretrial services agencies, the arguments of the 30 prosecutor and principal and available information about the principal, 31 including: 32 (a) The principal's character, reputation, habits, mental condition, 33 activities and history; 34 (b) If the principal is a defendant, the charges facing the principal 35 and the weight of the evidence against such principal in the pending 36 criminal action; 37 (c) The principal's criminal conviction record if any; 38 (d) The principal's record of previous adjudication as a juvenile 39 delinquent, as retained pursuant to section 354.1 of the family court 40 act, or, of pending cases where fingerprints are retained pursuant to 41 section 306.1 of such act, or a youthful offender, if any; 42 (e) The principal's previous record with respect to flight to avoid 43 criminal prosecution and lack of compliance with court orders; 44 (f) [If monetary bail is authorized, according to the restrictions set 45 forth in this title, the principal's individual financial circumstances, 46 and, in cases where bail is authorized, the principal's ability to post 47 bail without posing undue hardship, as well as his or her ability to 48 obtain a secured, unsecured, or partially secured bond; 49 (g)] Any violation by the principal of an order of protection issued 50 by any court; 51 [(h)] (g) The principal's history of use or possession of a firearm; 52 [(i)] (h) Whether the charge is alleged to have caused serious harm to 53 an individual or group of individuals; [and 54 (j)] (i) If the principal is a defendant, in the case of an applica- 55 tion for a securing order pending appeal, the merit or lack of merit of 56 the appeal[.]; S. 2282--A 4 1 (j) Whether the principal has any known associations with criminal 2 street gangs or criminal enterprises; 3 (k) The principal's ties to the jurisdiction where the court sits and 4 whether the principal has any ties outside the state of New York; and 5 (l) The charges facing the principal and the weight of the evidence 6 against such principal in the pending criminal action. 7 § 6. Subdivision 4 of section 510.10 of the criminal procedure law is 8 REPEALED and two new subdivisions 4 and 7 are added to read as follows: 9 4. Where a principal is arrested on a new offense of a felony or class 10 A misdemeanor which was committed after being released pending trial, or 11 being issued an appearance ticket, such principal shall be committed to 12 the custody of the sheriff until appearing before a judge for arraign- 13 ment. Upon arraignment, the court shall remand the principal to the 14 custody of the sheriff unless and until the judge, after reviewing all 15 relevant information, including the risk assessment instrument created 16 pursuant to section 510.16 of this title, determines that the risk that 17 the principal will reoffend has been mitigated with appropriate condi- 18 tions of release. Should the court determine that such risk cannot be 19 mitigated with any reasonable conditions of release, the court shall 20 order that the principal remain in the custody of the sheriff during the 21 pendency of the proceeding. 22 7. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the court from directing 23 that a defendant who presents an immediate risk of serious harm to them- 24 self or others be transported to a hospital for a psychiatric assessment 25 and appropriate treatment pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision 26 three-c of section 500.10 of this title. 27 § 7. Subdivisions 3 and 5 of section 510.10 of the criminal procedure 28 law, subdivision 3 as amended by section 2 of subpart A of part VV of 29 chapter 56 of the laws of 2023 and subdivision 5 as added by section 2 30 of part JJJ of chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 3. [In cases other than as described in subdivision four of this 33 section, the] The court [shall] may commit the principal to the custody 34 of the sheriff, fix bail, release the principal pending trial on the 35 principal's own recognizance, [unless the court finds on the record or 36 in writing that release on the principal's own recognizance will not 37 reasonably assure the principal's return to court. In such instances, 38 the court shall] or release the principal under non-monetary conditions 39 as provided for in subdivision three-a of section 500.10 of this title 40 that will reasonably assure the principal's return to court. The court 41 shall explain its choice of securing order on the record or in writing. 42 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of [subdivisions] subdivision three 43 [and four] of this section, with respect to any charge for which bail or 44 remand is not ordered, and for which the court would not or could not 45 otherwise require bail or remand, a defendant may, at any time, request 46 that the court set bail in a nominal amount requested by the defendant 47 in the form specified in paragraph (a) of subdivision one of section 48 520.10 of this title; if the court is satisfied that the request is 49 voluntary, the court shall set such bail in such amount. 50 § 8. Subparagraphs (ix), (x) and (xi) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 51 1 of section 150.20 of the criminal procedure law, as added by section 1 52 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, are amended 53 to read as follows: 54 (ix) the person is eighteen years of age or older and charged with 55 criminal possession of a weapon on school grounds as defined in section 56 265.01-a of the penal law; or S. 2282--A 5 1 (x) the person is eighteen years of age or older and charged with a 2 hate crime as defined in section 485.05 of the penal law[; or 3 (xi) the offense is a qualifying offense pursuant to paragraph (t) of 4 subdivision four of section 510.10 of this chapter, or pursuant to para- 5 graph (t) of subdivision four of section 530.40 of this chapter]. 6 § 9. Subdivision 1 of section 530.20 of the criminal procedure law, as 7 amended by section 16 of part JJJ of chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, 8 paragraph (a) and the opening paragraph of paragraph (b) as amended by 9 section 6 of subpart A of part VV of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, 10 paragraph (b) as amended by section 3 of part UU of chapter 56 of the 11 laws of 2020, subparagraphs (xix) and (xx) of paragraph (b) as amended 12 and subparagraph (xxi) of paragraph (b) as added by section 4 of subpart 13 C of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 14 follows: 15 1. (a) [In cases other than as described in paragraph (b) of this 16 subdivision, the] The court shall commit the principal to the custody of 17 the sheriff, fix bail, release the principal pending trial on the prin- 18 cipal's own recognizance or release the principal pending trial under 19 non-monetary conditions, the determination for which shall be made in 20 accordance with subdivision one of section 510.10 of this title. The 21 court shall explain the basis for its determination and choice of secur- 22 ing order on the record or in writing. 23 (b) [Where the principal stands charged with a qualifying offense, the 24 court, unless otherwise prohibited by law, may in its discretion release 25 the principal pending trial on the principal's own recognizance or under 26 non-monetary conditions, fix bail, order non-monetary conditions in 27 conjunction with fixing bail, or, where the defendant is charged with a 28 qualifying offense which is a felony, the court may commit the principal 29 to the custody of the sheriff. The court shall explain its choice of 30 securing order on the record or in writing. A principal stands charged 31 with a qualifying offense when he or she stands charged with: 32 (i) a felony enumerated in section 70.02 of the penal law, other than 33 robbery in the second degree as defined in subdivision one of section 34 160.10 of the penal law, provided, however, that burglary in the second 35 degree as defined in subdivision two of section 140.25 of the penal law 36 shall be a qualifying offense only where the defendant is charged with 37 entering the living area of the dwelling; 38 (ii) a crime involving witness intimidation under section 215.15 of 39 the penal law; 40 (iii) a crime involving witness tampering under section 215.11, 215.12 41 or 215.13 of the penal law; 42 (iv) a class A felony defined in the penal law, provided, that for 43 class A felonies under article two hundred twenty of such law, only 44 class A-I felonies shall be a qualifying offense; 45 (v) a sex trafficking offense defined in section 230.34 or 230.34-a of 46 the penal law, or a felony sex offense defined in section 70.80 of the 47 penal law or a crime involving incest as defined in section 255.25, 48 255.26 or 255.27 of such law, or a misdemeanor defined in article one 49 hundred thirty of such law; 50 (vi) conspiracy in the second degree as defined in section 105.15 of 51 the penal law, where the underlying allegation of such charge is that 52 the defendant conspired to commit a class A felony defined in article 53 one hundred twenty-five of the penal law; 54 (vii) money laundering in support of terrorism in the first degree as 55 defined in section 470.24 of the penal law; money laundering in support 56 of terrorism in the second degree as defined in section 470.23 of the S. 2282--A 6 1 penal law; money laundering in support of terrorism in the third degree 2 as defined in section 470.22 of the penal law; money laundering in 3 support of terrorism in the fourth degree as defined in section 470.21 4 of the penal law; or a felony crime of terrorism as defined in article 5 four hundred ninety of the penal law, other than the crime defined in 6 section 490.20 of such law; 7 (viii) criminal contempt in the second degree as defined in subdivi- 8 sion three of section 215.50 of the penal law, criminal contempt in the 9 first degree as defined in subdivision (b), (c) or (d) of section 215.51 10 of the penal law or aggravated criminal contempt as defined in section 11 215.52 of the penal law, and the underlying allegation of such charge of 12 criminal contempt in the second degree, criminal contempt in the first 13 degree or aggravated criminal contempt is that the defendant violated a 14 duly served order of protection where the protected party is a member of 15 the defendant's same family or household as defined in subdivision one 16 of section 530.11 of this article; 17 (ix) facilitating a sexual performance by a child with a controlled 18 substance or alcohol as defined in section 263.30 of the penal law, use 19 of a child in a sexual performance as defined in section 263.05 of the 20 penal law or luring a child as defined in subdivision one of section 21 120.70 of the penal law, promoting an obscene sexual performance by a 22 child as defined in section 263.10 of the penal law or promoting a sexu- 23 al performance by a child as defined in section 263.15 of the penal law; 24 (x) any crime that is alleged to have caused the death of another 25 person; 26 (xi) criminal obstruction of breathing or blood circulation as defined 27 in section 121.11 of the penal law, strangulation in the second degree 28 as defined in section 121.12 of the penal law or unlawful imprisonment 29 in the first degree as defined in section 135.10 of the penal law, and 30 is alleged to have committed the offense against a member of the defend- 31 ant's same family or household as defined in subdivision one of section 32 530.11 of this article; 33 (xii) aggravated vehicular assault as defined in section 120.04-a of 34 the penal law or vehicular assault in the first degree as defined in 35 section 120.04 of the penal law; 36 (xiii) assault in the third degree as defined in section 120.00 of the 37 penal law or arson in the third degree as defined in section 150.10 of 38 the penal law, when such crime is charged as a hate crime as defined in 39 section 485.05 of the penal law; 40 (xiv) aggravated assault upon a person less than eleven years old as 41 defined in section 120.12 of the penal law or criminal possession of a 42 weapon on school grounds as defined in section 265.01-a of the penal 43 law; 44 (xv) grand larceny in the first degree as defined in section 155.42 of 45 the penal law, enterprise corruption as defined in section 460.20 of the 46 penal law, or money laundering in the first degree as defined in section 47 470.20 of the penal law; 48 (xvi) failure to register as a sex offender pursuant to section one 49 hundred sixty-eight-t of the correction law or endangering the welfare 50 of a child as defined in subdivision one of section 260.10 of the penal 51 law, where the defendant is required to maintain registration under 52 article six-C of the correction law and designated a level three offen- 53 der pursuant to subdivision six of section one hundred sixty-eight-l of 54 the correction law; S. 2282--A 7 1 (xvii) a crime involving bail jumping under section 215.55, 215.56 or 2 215.57 of the penal law, or a crime involving escaping from custody 3 under section 205.05, 205.10 or 205.15 of the penal law; 4 (xviii) any felony offense committed by the principal while serving a 5 sentence of probation or while released to post release supervision; 6 (xix) a felony, where the defendant qualifies for sentencing on such 7 charge as a persistent felony offender pursuant to section 70.10 of the 8 penal law; 9 (xx) any felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifi- 10 able person or property, or any charge of criminal possession of a 11 firearm as defined in section 265.01-b of the penal law where such 12 charge arose from conduct occurring while the defendant was released on 13 his or her own recognizance, released under conditions, or had yet to be 14 arraigned after the issuance of a desk appearance ticket for a separate 15 felony or class A misdemeanor involving harm to an identifiable person 16 or property, provided, however, that the prosecutor must show reasonable 17 cause to believe that the defendant committed the instant crime and any 18 underlying crime. For the purposes of this subparagraph, any of the 19 underlying crimes need not be a qualifying offense as defined in this 20 subdivision. For the purposes of this paragraph, "harm to an identifi- 21 able person or property" shall include but not be limited to theft of or 22 damage to property. However, based upon a review of the facts alleged in 23 the accusatory instrument, if the court determines that such theft is 24 negligible and does not appear to be in furtherance of other criminal 25 activity, the principal shall be released on his or her own recognizance 26 or under appropriate non-monetary conditions; or 27 (xxi) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined 28 in subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale 29 of a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law. 30 (d)] Notwithstanding the provisions of [paragraphs] paragraph (a) [and 31 (b)] of this subdivision, with respect to any charge for which bail or 32 remand is not ordered, and for which the court would not or could not 33 otherwise require bail or remand, a defendant may, at any time, request 34 that the court set bail in a nominal amount requested by the defendant 35 in the form specified in paragraph (a) of subdivision one of section 36 520.10 of this title; if the court is satisfied that the request is 37 voluntary, the court shall set such bail in such amount. 38 § 10. Section 530.20 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 39 adding two new subdivisions 3 and 4 to read as follows: 40 3. Where a principal is arrested on a new offense of a felony or class 41 A misdemeanor which was committed after being released pending trial, or 42 being issued an appearance ticket, such principal shall be committed to 43 the custody of the sheriff until appearing before a judge for arraign- 44 ment. Upon arraignment, the court shall remand the principal to the 45 custody of the sheriff unless and until the judge, after reviewing all 46 relevant information, including the risk assessment instrument created 47 pursuant to section 510.16 of this title, determines that the risk that 48 the principal will reoffend has been mitigated with appropriate condi- 49 tions of release. Should the court determine that such risk cannot be 50 mitigated with any reasonable conditions of release, the court shall 51 order that the principal remain in the custody of the sheriff during the 52 pendency of the proceeding. 53 4. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the court from directing 54 that a defendant who presents an immediate risk of serious harm to them- 55 self or others be transported to a hospital for a psychiatric assessment S. 2282--A 8 1 and appropriate treatment pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 three-c of section 500.10 of this title. 3 § 11. Subdivision 4 of section 530.40 of the criminal procedure law is 4 REPEALED and two new subdivisions 4 and 8 are added to read as follows: 5 4. Where a principal is arrested on a new offense of a felony or class 6 A misdemeanor which was committed after being released pending trial, or 7 being issued an appearance ticket, such principal shall be committed to 8 the custody of the sheriff until appearing before a judge for arraign- 9 ment. Upon arraignment, the court shall remand the principal to the 10 custody of the sheriff unless and until the judge, after reviewing all 11 relevant information, including the risk assessment instrument created 12 pursuant to section 510.16 of this title, determines that the risk that 13 the principal will reoffend has been mitigated with appropriate condi- 14 tions of release. Should the court determine that such risk cannot be 15 mitigated with any reasonable conditions of release, the court shall 16 order that the principal remain in the custody of the sheriff during the 17 pendency of the proceeding. 18 8. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the court from directing 19 that a defendant who presents an immediate risk of serious harm to them- 20 self or others be transported to a hospital for a psychiatric assessment 21 and appropriate treatment pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision 22 three-c of section 500.10 of this title. 23 § 12. Subdivisions 2, 5, 6 and 7 of section 530.40 of the criminal 24 procedure law, subdivision 5 as added and subdivisions 2, 6 and 7 as 25 amended by section 18 of part JJJ of chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, are 26 amended to read as follows: 27 2. [When the defendant is charged with a felony, the] The court may[, 28 unless otherwise provided by law in its discretion,] order recognizance, 29 release under non-monetary conditions or, [where authorized,] bail. In 30 any such case in which an indictment (a) has resulted from an order of a 31 local criminal court holding the defendant for the action of the grand 32 jury, or (b) was filed at a time when a felony complaint charging the 33 same conduct was pending in a local criminal court, and in which such 34 local criminal court or a superior court judge has issued an order of 35 recognizance, release under non-monetary conditions or, where author- 36 ized, bail which is still effective, the superior court's order may be 37 in the form of a direction continuing the effectiveness of the previous 38 order. 39 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of [subdivisions] subdivision three 40 [and four] of this section, with respect to any charge for which bail or 41 remand is not ordered, and for which the court would not or could not 42 otherwise require bail or remand, a defendant may, at any time, request 43 that the court set bail in a nominal amount requested by the defendant 44 in the form specified in paragraph (a) of subdivision one of section 45 520.10 of this title; if the court is satisfied that the request is 46 voluntary, the court shall set such bail in such amount. 47 6. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions two[,] and three 48 [and four] of this section, a superior court may not order recognizance, 49 release under non-monetary conditions or, where authorized, bail, or 50 permit a defendant to remain at liberty pursuant to an existing order, 51 after the defendant has been convicted of either: (a) a class A felony 52 or (b) any class B or class C felony as defined in article one hundred 53 thirty of the penal law committed or attempted to be committed by a 54 person eighteen years of age or older against a person less than eigh- 55 teen years of age. In either case the court must commit or remand the 56 defendant to the custody of the sheriff. S. 2282--A 9 1 7. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions two[,] and three 2 [and four] of this section, a superior court may not order recognizance, 3 release under non-monetary conditions or, where authorized, bail when 4 the defendant is charged with a felony unless and until the district 5 attorney has had an opportunity to be heard in the matter and such court 6 and counsel for the defendant have been furnished with a report as 7 described in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (b) of subdivision two of 8 section 530.20 of this article. 9 § 13. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 10 the provisions of sections four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten, 11 eleven and twelve of this act shall take effect on the one hundred twen- 12 tieth day after it shall have become a law.